Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.010

Patrol created.

There shall be a department of state government known as the "Washington state patrol." The chief thereof shall be known as the chief of the Washington state patrol, and members thereof shall be known as Washington state patrol officers.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.43.010. Prior: 1933 c 25 s 1; RRS s 6362-59.]